Maryland, session 2025, HB1179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–147.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “INSTRUCTIONAL TIME” MEANS ANY TIME DURING
THE SCHOOL DAY, EXCEPT A STUDENT’S LUNCH PERIOD.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY.
(C) THE MONTGOMERY COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION SHALL DEVELOP
AND IMPLEMENT A POLICY TO LIMIT THE USE OF CELLULAR PHONES BY STUDENTS
DURING INSTRUCTIONAL TIME.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1179*

HOUSE BILL 1179
(D) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, THE
POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) PROHIBIT A STUDENT FROM USING A CELLULAR PHONE DURING
INSTRUCTIONAL TIME; AND
(2) REQUIRE A STUDENT TO STORE THE STUDENT’S CELLULAR
PHONE IN A SECURE PLACE DURING INSTRUCTIONAL TIME, INCLUDING:
(I) A LOCKER;
(II) A CLOSED BACKPACK; OR
(III) A STORAGE DEVICE.
(E) THE POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT PROHIBIT A
STUDENT FROM USING A CELLULAR PHONE:
(1) FOR ANY PURPOSE DOCUMENTED IN THE STUDENT’S
INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM;
(2) TO MONITOR OR ADDRESS A HEALTH ISSUE; OR
(3) WHEN DIRECTED BY AN EDUCATOR OR ADMINISTRATOR FOR
EDUCATIONAL PURPOSES.
(F) THE POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE
APPROPRIATE DISCIPLINARY MEASURES FOR VIOLATIONS OF THE POLICY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.